Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201358-836
Authority; general powers; joint projects.

The
authority may do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes
of the Nebraska Educational,
Health, and Social Services Finance Authority Act.

In carrying out the purposes of the act, the authority may
undertake a project for two or more eligible institutions jointly,
or for any combination thereof, and thereupon all other provisions of the
act shall apply to and be for the benefit of the authority and such joint
participants.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 33;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2933;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 33;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1733;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 36.
September 6, 2013